Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 7 Compensation

53-6-60.
Amount.

Personal representatives shall be compensated as specified in either the will or any written agreement entered into prior to the decedent’s death or a written agreement signed by all the beneficiaries of a testate estate or all the heirs of an intestate estate. A written agreement between a testator and a personal representative shall be valid and binding upon the estate of the testator as fully and completely as if set forth in and made a part of the will.

If the personal representative’s compensation is not specified in the will or any separate written agreement, the personal representative for services rendered shall be entitled to compensation equal to:

Two and one-half percent commission on all sums of money received by the personal representative on account of the estate, except on money loaned by and repaid to the personal representative, and 2 1/2 percent commission on all sums paid out by the personal representative, either for debts, legacies, or distributive shares;

Ten percent commission on the amount of interest made if, during the course of administration, the personal representative shall receive interest on money loaned by the personal representative in that capacity and shall include the same on the return to the probate court so as to become chargeable therewith as a part of the corpus of the estate;

Reasonable compensation, as determined in the discretion of the probate court and after such notice, if any, as the court shall direct, for the delivery over of property in kind, not exceeding 3 percent of the appraised value and, in cases where there has been no appraisal, not over 3 percent of the fair value as found by the judge, irrespective of whether delivery over in kind is made pursuant to proceedings for that purpose in the probate court and irrespective of whether the property, except money, is tangible or intangible, personal or real; and

In the discretion of the probate court, compensation for working land for the benefit of the parties in interest in no case exceeding 10 percent of the annual income of the property so managed.

Whenever any portion of the dividends, interest, or rents payable to a personal representative is required by law of the United States or other governmental unit to be withheld by the person paying the same for income tax purposes, the amount so withheld shall be deemed to have been collected by the personal representative.

Unless the will or written agreement specifies otherwise, where some or all of the estate passes through the hands of several personal representatives by reason of the death, removal, or resignation of the first qualified personal representative, or otherwise, the estate shall not be subject to diminution by charges of commission of each successive personal representative holding and receiving in the same right but rather commissions for receiving the estate shall be paid to the first personal representative who receives the property for the benefit of the estate or that person’s representative, and commissions for paying out shall be paid to the personal representative who actually distributes the fund, and no commissions shall be paid for handing over the fund to a successor personal representative. If there is more than one personal representative serving simultaneously, the division of the compensation allowed them shall be according to the services rendered by each.

Unless the will or written agreement specifies otherwise, a personal representative is entitled to receive commissions on debts, legacies, and distributive shares paid to that personal representative in the same manner as commissions to which the personal representative would be entitled under the terms of the will or written agreement or applicable law on such items paid to others; provided, however, that a personal representative shall not be entitled to any commissions for any sums paid to any personal representative of the estate as commissions or other compensation.

Personal representatives who fail to make annual returns as required by law shall forfeit all commissions for transactions during the year within which no return is made unless the probate court, upon cause shown, shall by special order entered on the minutes relieve them from the forfeiture.

A personal representative may renounce the right to all or any part of the compensation to which the personal representative is entitled under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 17; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 27; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 53/HB 1428.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that” for “provided, however,” in the middle of subsection (e).

Law reviews.

For article on the problems and benefits of multiple fiduciaries in estate planning, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 355 (1981).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-6-61.
Expenses.

Personal representatives shall be allowed reasonable expenses incurred in the administration of the estate, including without limitation expenses for travel, the expenses and premiums incurred in securing a bond, and the expenses of counsel and other agents. Such reasonable expenses shall be determined after such notice, if any, as the court shall direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 28.

53-6-62.
Extra compensation.

A personal representative may petition the probate court for compensation that is greater than that allowed under Code Section 53-6-60. Service of notice of the petition for extra compensation shall be made on all the heirs of an intestate decedent or on any affected beneficiaries under the will of a testate decedent. Service of notice shall be made in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title and shall direct the parties served to file any written objections to the extra compensation with the probate court within 30 days.

After hearing any objection filed by the heirs or beneficiaries of the estate, the probate court shall allow such extra compensation as the court deems reasonable; provided, however, that if no such objection is filed or any such objection is dismissed or withdrawn, the court, in its discretion, may enter an order allowing such extra compensation as the court deems reasonable without a hearing. The allowance of extra compensation shall be conclusive as to all parties in interest.

If the amount of compensation that is specified in a testator’s will is less than the amount allowed under Code Section 53-6-60, the personal representative may petition for greater compensation in the manner provided in subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 18; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-35/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “on” for “to” twice in the second sentence, and, in the last sentence, substituted “Service of notice shall be made in the manner provided by” for “Service shall be made in the manner described in” at the beginning, and substituted “30 days” for “ten days” at the end; added the proviso at the end of the first sentence in subsection (b); and substituted “provided in subsection (a) of this Code section” for “described in this Code section” at the end of
subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For article on the problems and benefits of multiple fiduciaries in estate planning, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 355 (1981).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-6-63.
Compensation from business enterprise.

Any executor who is a domiciliary of this state may receive compensation for services, as specified in this subsection, from a corporation or other business enterprise where the estate of the decedent owns an interest in the corporation or other business enterprise, provided that:

The services provided by the executor to the corporation or other business enterprise are of a managerial, executive, or business advisory nature;

The compensation received for the services is reasonable; and

The services are performed and the executor is paid pursuant to a contract executed by the executor and the corporation or business enterprise, which contract is approved by a majority of those members of the board of directors or other similar governing authority of the corporation or business enterprise who are not officers or employees of the executor and are not related to the executor and provided the contract is approved by the probate court of the county in which the administration proceeding is pending.

Any executor receiving compensation from a corporation or other business enterprise for services to it as described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not receive extra compensation in respect to such services as provided in Code Section 53-6-62; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the receipt by the executor of extra compensation for services rendered in respect to other assets or matters involving the estate.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the receipt by executors of normal commissions and compensation for the usual services performed by executors pursuant to law or pursuant to any fee agreement executed by the testator.

The purpose of this Code section is to enable additional compensation to be paid to executors for business management and advisory services to corporations and business enterprises pursuant to contract, without the necessity of petitioning for extra compensation pursuant to Code Section 53-6-62.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article surveying developments in Georgia concerning partnerships and corporations from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 19 (1981).

53-6-64.
Compensation to temporary administrator.

A temporary administrator may apply to the court for reasonable compensation after notice to interested parties in compliance with Chapter 11 of this title. The court shall award reasonable compensation to a temporary administrator. For good cause, including but not limited to services performed and compensation awarded to a temporary administrator, the court may reduce the compensation due the personal representative under other provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 19.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the enactment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).